lv_lex.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

dzīvniek N1dekl;
sviest N1dekl;
zēn N1dekl;

tunel N2dekl;
vērs N2dekl;
knāb N2dekl;
bried N2dekl;
divdab N2dekl;

med N3dekl;
led N3dekl;

laim N5dekl;
up N5dekl;
meiten N5dekl;
zvaigzn N5dekl;
mut N5dekl;

ac N6dekl;
nakt N6dekl;
telt N6dekl;
ziv N6dekl;

LEXICON N1dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N2dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Ma  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^im #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^Mi  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^Miem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Mus #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^Mos #;

LEXICON N3dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^us  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N5dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^e  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs #;

LEXICON N6dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ij #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs #;
